North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-5.1.
Optional retirement program for The University of North Carolina.

An Optional Retirement Program provided for in this section is authorized and established and shall be implemented by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. The Optional Retirement Program shall be underwritten by the purchase of
annuity contracts, which may be both fixed and variable contracts or a combination thereof, or financed through the establishment of a trust, for the benefit of participants in the Program. Participation in the Optional Retirement
Program shall be limited to University personnel who are eligible for membership in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement Program and who are:

Administrators and faculty of The University of North Carolina with the rank of instructor or above;

The President and employees of The University of North Carolina who are appointed by the Board of Governors on recommendation of the President pursuant to G.S. 116-11(4), 116-11(5), and 116-14 or who are appointed by the Board of Trustees of a constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina upon the recommendation of the Chancellor pursuant to G.S. 116-40.22(b);

Nonfaculty instructional and research staff who are exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act, as defined by the provisions of G.S. 126-5(c1)(8), and the faculty of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics; and

Field faculty of the Cooperative Agriculture Extension Service, and tenure track faculty in North Carolina State University agriculture research programs who are exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act and who are eligible for membership in
the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to

G.S. 135-3(1)

, who in any of the cases described in this subsection (i) had been members of the Optional Retirement Program under the provisions of Chapter 338, Session Laws of 1971, immediately prior to July 1, 1985,
or (ii) have sought membership as required in subsection (b), below. Under the Optional Retirement Program, the State and the participant shall contribute, to the extent authorized or required, toward the purchase of such
contracts or deposited in such trust on the participant’s behalf.

Employees of The University of North Carolina Health Care System, subject to rules for eligibility and participation as may be adopted by the Board of Governors in the Optional Retirement Program plan document.

Employees hired on or after January 1, 2013.

Participation in the Optional Retirement Program shall be governed as follows:

Those participating in the Optional Retirement Program immediately prior to July 1, 1985, under the provisions of Chapter 338, Session Laws of 1971, are deemed automatically enrolled in the Program as established by this section.

Eligible employees initially appointed on or after July 1, 1985, shall at the same time of entering upon eligible employment elect (i) to join the Retirement System in accordance with the provisions of law applicable thereto or (ii) to participate in
the Optional Retirement Program. This election shall be in writing and filed with the Retirement System and with the employing institution and shall be effective as of the date of entry into eligible service. For purposes
of this provision, the Optional Retirement Program shall be permitted to file individual election forms with the Retirement System using electronic transmission.

An election to participate in the Optional Retirement Program shall be irrevocable. An eligible employee failing to elect to participate in the Optional Retirement Program at the time of entry into eligible service shall automatically be enrolled as a
member of the Retirement System.

No election by an eligible employee of the Optional Retirement Program shall be effective unless it is accompanied by an appropriate application for the issuance of a contract or contracts or trust participation under the Program.

If any participant in the Optional Retirement Program having less than five years of total membership service under any combination of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System, or the Optional Retirement Program leaves the employ of The University of North Carolina and either retires or commences employment with an employer not having a retirement program with the same
company underwriting the participant’s annuity contract, regardless of whether the annuity contract is held by the participant, a trust, or the Retirement System, the participant’s interest in the Optional Retirement Program
attributable to contributions of The University of North Carolina shall be forfeited. Consistent with Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, no part of the corpus or income of the Optional Retirement Program, or any
trust established under that Program, may be (within the taxable year or thereafter) used for purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of participants and their beneficiaries, except that contributions made under a
good faith mistake of fact may be returned, consistent with the rules adopted by the University.

Each employing institution shall contribute on behalf of each participant in the Optional Retirement Program an amount equal to a percentage of the participant’s compensation as established from time to time by the General Assembly. Each participant shall
contribute the amount which he or she would be required to contribute if a member of the Retirement System. Contributions authorized or required by the provisions of this subsection on behalf of each participant shall be made,
consistent with Section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, by salary reduction according to rules and regulations established by The University of North Carolina. Additional personal contributions may also be made by a participant
by payroll deduction or salary reduction to an annuity or retirement income plan established pursuant to

G.S. 116-17

. Payment of contributions shall be made by the employing institution to the designated company or companies underwriting the annuities or the trustees for the benefit of each participant, and this employer contribution
shall not be subject to any State tax if made under the Optional Retirement Program or, otherwise, by salary reduction.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall designate the company or companies from which contracts are to be purchased or the trustee responsible for the investment of contributions under the Optional Retirement Program, and shall
approve the form and contents of such contracts or trust agreement. In making this designation and giving such approval, the Board shall give due consideration to the following:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by these contracts or trust agreement for participants and their beneficiaries;

The relation of these rights and benefits to the amount of contributions to be made;

The suitability of these rights and benefits to the needs of the participants and the interest of the institutions of The University of North Carolina in recruiting and retaining faculty in a national market; and

The ability of the designated company or companies underwriting the annuity contracts or trust agreement to provide these suitable rights and benefits under such contracts or trust agreement for these purposes.Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection,
no contractual relationship established under the Optional Retirement Program pursuant to the authority granted by Chapter 338, Session Laws of 1971, is deemed terminated by the provisions of this section.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina may provide for the administration of the Optional Retirement Program and may perform or authorize the performance of all functions necessary for its administration.

Any eligible employee electing to participate in the Optional Retirement Program is ineligible for membership in the Retirement System so long as he or she remains employed in any eligible position within The University of North Carolina, and, in this
event, he or she shall continue to participate in the Optional Retirement Program.

No retirement benefit, death benefit, or other benefit under the Optional Retirement Program shall be paid by the State of North Carolina, or The University of North Carolina, or the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System
with respect to any employee selecting and participating in the Optional Retirement Program or with respect to any beneficiary of that employee. Benefits shall be payable to participants or their beneficiaries only by the designated
company in accordance with the terms of the contracts or trust agreement.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall ensure that the Optional Retirement Program contains benefit forfeiture provisions equivalent to those contained in

G.S. 135-18.10

A for University personnel who are eligible for membership in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System and have elected participation in the Optional Retirement Program. Any funds forfeited shall be deposited
in the Optional Retirement Program trust fund(s).

History.
1971, c. 338, s. 2; c. 916; 1973, c. 1425; 1977, c. 1070; 1985, c. 309; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 28; 2001-424, s. 32.27; 2003-356, s. 1; 2006-172, ss. 2, 3; 2011-145, ss. 29.26, 29.27; 2012-142, ss. 25.11, 25.12;
2012-193, s. 11; 2013-288, s. 5; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Cross References.

As to the pick up of certain employee contributions by the employer, see

G.S. 135-8

.

§ 135-5.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(a), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1977, c. 1007; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(a), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-5.3.
Optional participation for charter schools operated by private nonprofit corporations or municipalities.

, (b) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-168, s. 1, effective January 1, 2016.

(b1) The board of directors of a charter school operated by a private nonprofit corporation or a charter school operated by a municipality that has received State Board of Education approval under

G.S. 115C-218.5

may elect to become a participating employer in the Retirement System in accordance with this Article.

(b2) A charter school desiring to participate in the Retirement System shall file with the Board of Trustees an application for participation on a form approved by the Board of Trustees. In the application, the charter school shall agree to make the contributions
required of participating employers, to deduct from the salaries of employees who may become members the contributions required of members under this Chapter, and to transmit the contributions to the Board of Trustees. The
charter school shall also agree to make the employer’s contributions for the participation in the Retirement System of all employees entering the service of the employer, after the charter school’s participation begins, who
shall become members.

(b3) A charter school seeking to become a participating employer in the Retirement System prior to the end of the second year of operation shall be granted provisional entry into the Retirement System for one year. In the event the employee or employer
contributions required under G.S. 135-8(f) are not received by the date set by the Board of Trustees, the Board of Trustees may revoke the charter school’s provisional entry into the Retirement System. The Board must notify
a charter school in writing not less than 90 days prior to revoking a charter school’s provisional entry into the Retirement System. One year after the charter school was granted provisional entry into the Retirement System,
the charter school shall undergo an actuarial and financial review as required by the Board of Trustees.

(b4) A charter school seeking to become a participating employer in the Retirement System after the end of the initial year of operation but before the end of the second year of operation may undergo an actuarial and financial review as required by the
Board of Trustees prior to entry into the Retirement System. A charter school seeking to become a participating employer in the Retirement System after the end of the second year of operation shall undergo an actuarial and
financial review as required by the Board of Trustees prior to entry into the Retirement System.

(b5) The actuarial review will result in an estimate of the amount of the withdrawal liability that would be required under G.S. 135-8(i) to cease participation in the Retirement System after five years and the amount that would be required to cease participation
after 10 years. The cost of this actuarial review shall be paid by the charter school and shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). A charter school that was granted provisional entry into the Retirement
System shall not be required to pay the cost of this actuarial review, and this cost may be classified as costs of administering investment programs under

G.S. 147-69.3

.

(b6) The financial review will be based on financial statements and independent audit reports held by the Local Government Commission or functionally equivalent financial statements and independent audit reports submitted to the Board of Trustees by the
charter school.

(b7) The Board of Trustees may grant final approval of the application if it finds the following:

The application meets the requirements set out in this Article.

All members of the board of directors of the charter school have signed a written statement acknowledging and accepting the estimate provided under subsection (b5) of this section and the provisions of G.S. 135-8(i).

The charter school has not been identified as continually low-performing by the State Board of Education as provided in

G.S. 115C-218.94

.

The charter school’s most recent audited financial statements and independent audit report demonstrate that it is financially sound and can meet the financial obligations of participation in the Retirement System.

(b8) Upon acceptance by the Board of Trustees of the application to become a participating employer, the charter school shall be a fully participating employer in the Retirement System. The Board may make the final decision for acceptance of the application
contingent upon the receipt of a financially sound independent audit report for the fiscal year ending prior to acceptance of the application.

(b9) For each charter school employee who is employed on or before the date the charter school is granted entry into the Retirement System, membership in the Retirement System is effective as of the date of entry. For each charter school employee who
is employed after the date the charter school is granted entry into the Retirement System, membership in the Retirement System is effective as of the date of that employee’s entry into eligible service. Provisional
entry is considered entry into the Retirement System for the purpose of this subsection.

(c) A charter school board’s election to become a participating employer in the Retirement System under this section shall require all eligible employees of the charter school to participate.

(d) No retirement benefit, death benefit, or other benefit payable under the Retirement System shall be paid by the State of North Carolina or the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System on account of employment with
a charter school with respect to any employee, or with respect to any beneficiary of an employee, of a charter school that is not a participating employer in the Retirement System.

(e) The board of directors of each charter school shall notify each of its employees as to whether the board elected to become a participating employer in the Retirement System under this section. This notification shall be in writing and shall be provided
within 30 days of the board’s election or at the time an initial offer for employment is made, whichever occurs last. If the board did not elect to join the Retirement System, the notice shall include a statement that
the employee shall have no legal recourse against the board or the State for any possible credit or reimbursement under the Retirement System. The employee shall provide written acknowledgment of the employee’s receipt
of the notification under this subsection.

(f) The board of directors of a charter school may elect to cease participation in the Retirement System for all of its employees by following the procedure in G.S. 135-8(i). Notwithstanding the requirement under G.S. 135-8(i)(6) that a charter school’s
withdrawal liability be paid in a lump sum, if the withdrawal liability of a charter school as calculated under G.S. 135-8(i)(5) is greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the Board of Trustees may allow a charter
school to pay the required lump sum amount on an installment payment plan that meets the following requirements:

(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the withdrawal liability must be paid within 90 days of the complete withdrawal date.

(2) The remaining fifty percent (50%) of the withdrawal liability shall be made in no greater than 36 equal monthly payments.Notwithstanding G.S. 135-8(i)(2), the complete withdrawal by a charter school that is under an approved installment payment plan
shall be the date of the Board of Trustees approval of the installment payment plan. All provisions of this Article relating to the complete withdrawal of an employer from the Retirement System shall be applicable to
the charter school as of that date.The Retirement System shall have a lien upon the real property of a charter school that has received approval under this subsection from the Board of Trustees to pay the lump sum amount
required under G.S. 135-8(i)(6) on installment at the time that the installment agreement is entered into and in the amount of the total withdrawal liability owed by the charter school. This lien shall attach to the
real property upon the approval of the installment payment plan by the Board of Trustees and shall be perfected upon filing in the office of the clerk of superior court in each county in which the real property is situated.
The priority of the lien shall be superior to all nongovernmental liens and rights, whether such liens and rights are prior or subsequent to the lien. The Retirement System may enforce the lien by judicial foreclosure
as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

History.
1998-212, s. 9.14A(b); 2014-101, s. 7; 2015-168, s. 1; 2016-79, s. 1.7(c); 2017-98, s. 1; 2018-84, s. 3(a); 2018-145, s. 20(c).

Local Modification.

Corvian Community School: 2013-279, s. 1.

Certain Municipalities Authorized to Establish and Operate Charter Schools.

Session Laws 2018-3, authorized municipalities in the Towns of Cornelius, Huntersville, Matthews, and Mint Hill to establish and operate charter schools.

§ 135-5.4.
Optional retirement program for State-funded community colleges.

An Optional Retirement Program provided for in this section is authorized and established and shall be implemented by the North Carolina Community Colleges System, (“System”). The Optional Retirement Program shall be underwritten by the purchase of annuity
contracts, which may be both fixed and variable contracts or a combination thereof, or financed through the establishment of a trust, for the benefit of the presidents of the community colleges all of whom are appointed after the
implementation of the Program and who elect membership as required by subsection (b) of this section on or before June 30, 2018. Under the Optional Retirement Program, the State and the participant shall contribute, to the extent
authorized or required, toward the purchase of such contracts or deposited in such trust on the participant’s behalf.

Participation in the Optional Retirement Program shall be governed as follows:

Employees initially appointed on or after the implementation of the Optional Retirement Program and on or before June 30, 2018, shall at the same time of entering upon eligible employment elect (i) to join the Retirement System in accordance with the
provisions of law applicable thereto or (ii) to participate in the Optional Retirement Program. This election shall be in writing and filed with the Retirement System and with the employing institution and shall be effective
as of the date of entry into eligible service.

An election to participate in the Optional Retirement Program shall be irrevocable. An eligible employee failing to elect to participate in the Optional Retirement Program at the time of entry into eligible service shall automatically be enrolled as a
member of the Retirement System.

No election by an eligible employee of the Optional Retirement Program shall be effective unless it is accompanied by an appropriate application for the issuance of a contract or contracts or trust participation under the Program.

If any participant having less than five years coverage under the Optional Retirement Program leaves the employ of the System and either retires or commences employment with an employer not having a retirement program with the same company underwriting
the participant’s annuity contract, regardless of whether the annuity contract is held by the participant, a trust, or the Retirement System, the participant’s interest in the Optional Retirement Program attributable to
contributions of the employing institution shall be forfeited and shall either (i) be refunded to the employing institution and forthwith paid by it to the Retirement System and credited to the pension accumulation fund
or (ii) be paid directly to the Retirement System and credited to the pension accumulation fund.

Each employing institution shall contribute on behalf of each participant in the Optional Retirement Program an amount equal to a percentage of the participant’s compensation as established from time to time by the General Assembly. Each participant shall
contribute the amount that he or she would be required to contribute if a member of the Retirement System. Contributions authorized or required by the provisions of this subsection on behalf of each participant shall be made, consistent
with section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, by salary reduction according to rules and regulations established by the employing institution. Additional personal contributions may also be made by a participant by payroll deduction
or salary reduction to an annuity or retirement income plan established pursuant to

G.S. 115D-25

. Payment of contributions shall be made by the employing institution to the designated company or companies underwriting the annuities or the trustees for the benefit of each participant, and this employer contribution
shall not be subject to any State tax if made under the Optional Retirement Program or, otherwise, by salary reduction.

The System shall designate the company or companies from which contracts are to be purchased or the trustee responsible for the investment of contributions under the Optional Retirement Program and shall approve the form and contents of such contracts
or trust agreement. In making this designation and giving such approval, the Board shall give due consideration to the following:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by these contracts or trust agreement for participants and their beneficiaries;

The relation of these rights and benefits to the amount of contributions to be made;

The suitability of these rights and benefits to the needs of the participants and the interest of the institutions of the System in recruiting and retaining faculty in a national and market;

The ability of the designated company or companies underwriting the annuity contracts or trust agreement to provide these suitable rights and benefits under such contracts or trust agreement for these purposes.In lieu of such designation and in order
to provide a more efficient, cost-effective, and flexible Program, the System may designate the company or companies designated for the Optional Retirement Program for State institutions of higher education as prescribed
in G.S. 135-5.1(d).Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, no contractual relationship established under the Optional Retirement Program pursuant to the authority granted by Chapter 338, Session Laws of 1971,
is deemed terminated by the provisions of this section.

The System or employing institution may provide for the administration of the Optional Retirement Program and may perform or authorize the performance of all functions necessary for its administration.

Any eligible employee electing to participate in the Optional Retirement Program is ineligible for membership in the Retirement System so long as he or she remains employed in any eligible position within the System, and, in this event, he or she shall
continue to participate in the Optional Retirement Program.

No retirement benefit, death benefit, or other benefit under the Optional Retirement Program shall be paid by the State of North Carolina, or the System, or the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System with respect to
any employee selecting and participating in the Optional Retirement Program or with respect to any beneficiary of that employee. Benefits shall be payable to participants or their beneficiaries only by the designated company in
accordance with the terms of the contracts or trust agreement.

The North Carolina Community College System shall ensure that the Optional Retirement Program for State-funded community colleges contains benefit forfeiture provisions equivalent to those contained in

G.S. 135-18.10

A for community college personnel eligible for membership in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System and have elected participation in the Optional Retirement Program. Any funds forfeited shall be deposited
in the Optional Retirement Program trust fund(s).

History.
2001-424, s. 32.24(a); 2001-513, s. 24; 2012-193, s. 12; 2018-84, s. 1.

§ 135-5.5.
Inactive employers.

An employer shall be considered an inactive employer if all of the following criteria are met:

The employer has no employees that qualify for membership in any System under this Chapter.

The employer has made no employer contributions for at least one month.

The employer makes a request in writing to the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer to be made inactive.

The Retirement Systems Division of the State Treasurer has reviewed the employer request to become inactive and has granted that request. The Retirement Systems Division shall provide written notification to the requesting employer of any decisions made
under this section.

Not later than April 30 of each calendar year, the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer shall make a report to the Board on all employers who were determined to be inactive employers in that preceding calendar year.

History.
2020-48, s. 1.9(a).